src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Q d ias   d lesniuosius   d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniaisiais  d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniuosiuose d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesnioji      d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniosios    d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniajai     d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesni j       d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesni ja      d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniojoj     d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniojoje    d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniosioms   d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesni sias    d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniosiomis  d ias     
SFX Q d ias   d lesniosiose   d ias     
SFX Q us       lesnis         us        
SFX Q us       lesnio         us        
SFX Q us       lesniam        us        
SFX Q us       lesn           us        
SFX Q us       lesniu         us        
SFX Q us       lesniame       us        
SFX Q us       lesni          us        
SFX Q us       lesni          us        
SFX Q us       lesniems       us        
SFX Q us       lesnius        us        
SFX Q us       lesniais       us        
SFX Q us       lesniuose      us        
SFX Q us       lesn           us        
SFX Q us       lesn s         us        
SFX Q us       lesnei         us        
SFX Q us       lesn           us        
SFX Q us       lesne          us        
SFX Q us       lesnioje       us        
SFX Q us       lesn ms        us        
SFX Q us       lesnes         us        
SFX Q us       lesn mis       us        
SFX Q us       lesn se        us        
SFX Q us       lesnysis       us        
SFX Q us       lesniojo       us        
SFX Q us       lesniajam      us        
SFX Q us       lesn j         us        
SFX Q us       lesniuoju      us        
SFX Q us       lesniajame     us        
SFX Q us       lesnieji       us        
SFX Q us       lesni j        us        
SFX Q us       lesniesiems    us        
SFX Q us       lesniuosius    us        
SFX Q us       lesniaisiais   us        
SFX Q us       lesniuosiuose  us        
SFX Q us       lesnioji       us        
SFX Q us       lesniosios     us        
SFX Q us       lesniajai      us        
SFX Q us       lesni j        us        
SFX Q us       lesni ja       us        
SFX Q us       lesniojoj      us        
SFX Q us       lesniojoje     us        
SFX Q us       lesniosioms    us        
SFX Q us       lesni sias     us        
SFX Q us       lesniosiomis   us        
SFX Q us       lesniosiose    us        
SFX Q is      iausio          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiam         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iaus            [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiu          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiame        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiems        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausius         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiais        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuose       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausia          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausios         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiai         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioje        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioms        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausias         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiomis       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiose        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiasis       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojo        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajam       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi j         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuoju       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajame      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausieji        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi j         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiesiems     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuosius     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiaisiais    [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuosiuose   [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioji        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosios      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajai       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi j         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi ja        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojoj       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojoje      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosioms     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi sias      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosiomis    [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosiose     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q ys      iausio          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiam         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iaus            [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiu          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiame        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi           [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi           [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiems        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausius         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiais        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuose       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausia          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausios         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiai         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi           [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausioje        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausioms        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausias         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiomis       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiose        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiasis       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiojo        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiajam       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi j         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuoju       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiajame      [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausieji        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi j         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiesiems     [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuosius     [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiaisiais    [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuosiuose   [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausioji        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiosios      [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiajai       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi j         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi ja        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiojoj       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiojoje      [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiosioms     [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi sias      [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiosiomis    [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiosiose     [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q as      iausio          [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiam         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi           [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiu          [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiame        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi           [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi           [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiems        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausius         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiais        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiuose       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausia          [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausios         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiai         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausioje        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausioms        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausias         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiomis       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiose        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiasis       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiojo        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiajam       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi j         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiuoju       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiajame      [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausieji        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi j         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiesiems     [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiuosius     [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiaisiais    [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiuosiuose   [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausioji        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiosios      [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiajai       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi j         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi ja        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiojoj       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiojoje      [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiosioms     [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi sias      [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiosiomis    [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiosiose     [^dtij]as 
SFX Q us      iausio          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausiam         [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausi           [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausiu          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausiame        [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausi           [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausi           [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausiems        [^dtj]us  
