src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
abuojas/ANQ
aik tus/ANQ
akiniuotas/ANQ
akmeningas/ANQ
akuotuotas/ANQ
alkus/ANQ
ambicingas/ANQ
anglinas/ANQ
ankstyvas/ANQ
antiislami kas/ANQ
apdairus/ANQ
apgrabus/ANQ
apmaudingas/ANQ
aptakus/ANQ
ar iausias/AQ
a akotas/ANQ
asociatyvus/ANQ
atgaivingas/ANQ
atkaklus/ANQ
atleti kas/ANQ
atsainus/ANQ
atskal ni kas/ANQ
atveikus/ANQ
audrus/ANQ
auksuotas/ANQ
azarti kas/ANQ
balnas/ADNQ
bambus/ANQ
batuotas/ANQ
b glus/ANQ
berg d ias/ANQ
betvarki kas/ANQ
bjaurus/ANQ
blizgus/ANQ
brandus/ANQ
bruto/ANQ
buklus/ANQ
choleri kas/ANQ
cukruotas/ANQ
dainingas/ANQ
dantingas/ANQ
dargus/ANQ
daugus/ANQ
defektyvus/ANQ
demagogi kas/ANQ
dervotas/ANQ
despoti kas/ANQ
didingas/ANQ
dievotas/ANQ
dir uotas/ANQ
dobiluotas/ANQ
dosnus/ANQ
dr singas/ANQ
dr blus/ANQ
drikus/ANQ
drumzl tas/ANQ
dr tokas/ANQ
dulkinas/ANQ
duob tas/ANQ
durpingas/ANQ
dvazgus/ANQ
dviveidi kas/ANQ
efektingas/ANQ
eiliuotas/ANQ
ekstensyvus/ANQ
eleganti kas/ANQ
energingas/ANQ
ereli kas/ANQ
esti kas/ANQ
fanati kas/ANQ
fiziologi kas/ANQ
funkcionalus/ANQ
gaisrus/ANQ
galiausias/ANQ
ganus/ANQ
garg dus/ANQ
gaubtas/ADNQ
geidulingas/ANQ
geltonas/ANQ
geras/ADNQ
gilus/ANQ
giringas/ANQ
gyvenimi kas/ANQ
glebus/ANQ
gludus/ANQ
godus/ANQ
graik tus/ANQ
graudus/ANQ
gretimas/ANQ
griozdi kas/ANQ
grotuotas/ANQ
gruzini kas/ANQ
gurguluotas/ANQ
heroji kas/ANQ
ikringas/ANQ
ilsus/ANQ
inerti kas/ANQ
intelektualus/ANQ
irzlus/ANQ
i eigus/ANQ
i kilmingas/ANQ
i maningas/ANQ
i rai kingas/ANQ
i teklingas/ANQ
i virk  ias/ANQ
japoni kas/AQ
jausmingas/ANQ
juodas/ANQ
j reivi kas/ANQ
kaimieti kas/ANQ
kalbingas/ANQ
kalnuotas/ANQ
kamblingas/ANQ
kandus/ANQ
kardinalus/ANQ
kar tligi kas/ANQ
katastrofi kas/ANQ
keblus/ANQ
keliaklups ias/ANQ
kepur tas/ANQ
k stas/ANQ
kiauli kas/ANQ
kieta irdi kas/ANQ
kimus/ANQ
kiu as/ANQ
klastus/ANQ
klint tas/ANQ
klusnus/ANQ
kni ps ias/ANQ
komedi kas/ANQ
konfidencialus/ANQ
kontrasti kas/ANQ
ko mari kas/AQ
kraugeri kas/ANQ
krekus/ANQ
kritus/ANQ
kr muotas/ANQ
kuklus/ANQ
kuoduotas/ANQ
k rybi kas/ANQ
kvapingas/ANQ
laidus/ANQ
laisvamani kas/ANQ
lakus/ANQ
la in tas/ANQ
ledinuotas/ANQ
l nas/ANQ
l tokas/ANQ
liepsningas/ANQ
lig stas/ANQ
lipus/ANQ
lygiagreti kas/ANQ
lobingas/ANQ
lopiniuotas/ANQ
madingas/ANQ
makaroni kas/ANQ
manevringas/ANQ
marksisti kas/ANQ
masyvus/ANQ
mauri kas/ANQ
mechanizuotas/ANQ
meilingas/ANQ
m lyniuotas/ANQ
menkokas/ANQ
m  luotas/ANQ
mieg stas/ANQ
miglotas/ANQ
minimalus/ANQ
mirtinas/ANQ
mobilus/ANQ
moksli kas/ANQ
monotoni kas/ANQ
muilingas/ANQ
m suotas/ANQ
naivus/ANQ
na us/ANQ
neapra omas/ANQ
nedoras/ANQ
neigiamas/ANQ
nekilnojamas/ANQ
nematytas/ANQ
nepabaigiamas/ANQ
nepermaldaujamas/ANQ
nervingas/ANQ
neuroti kas/ANQ
niekingas/ANQ
nirtulingas/ANQ
nykus/ANQ
nuliekamas/ANQ
nuodugnus/ANQ
nuokampus/ANQ
nuosavas/ANQ
nuotakus/ANQ
obskuranti kas/ANQ
optimalus/ANQ
orus/ANQ
padaiguotas/ANQ
pagelus/ANQ
pagrindus/ANQ
pa stri as/ANQ
pakantrus/ANQ
pakulinas/ANQ
pal as/ANQ
panev  ieti kas/ANQ
parankus/ANQ
partizani kas/ANQ
pa ankus/ANQ
pasip t li kas/ANQ
pa nekus/ANQ
patriarchali kas/ANQ
pavydus/ANQ
pelningas/ANQ
peruotas/ANQ
piktnaudi kas/ANQ
pirmiausias/ANQ
pleiskanotas/ANQ
plitus/ANQ
plovotas/ANQ
potencialus/ANQ
pramanus/ANQ
pratakus/ANQ
priekabingas/ANQ
prieveiksmi kas/ANQ
privalomas/ANQ
proti kas/ANQ
pumpuruotas/ANQ
putlus/ANQ
rai as/ANQ
ra aluotas/ANQ
reakcingas/ANQ
r kus/ANQ
revoliucingas/ANQ
riteri kas/ANQ
ro  tas/ANQ
rupus/ANQ
sakinas/ANQ
sangvini kas/ANQ
sausas/ANQ
savistovus/ANQ
seksualus/ANQ
siaubus/ANQ
silpnas/ANQ
skaidrus/ANQ
skaudokas/ANQ
skystas/ANQ
skryb liuotas/ANQ
sl ningas/ANQ
smailus/ANQ
smiltingas/ANQ
snieguotas/ANQ
spartus/ANQ
spragotas/ANQ
sravus/ANQ
standus/ANQ
stingus/ANQ
subjektyvus/ANQ
sunkus/ANQ
suvarstomas/ANQ
sviestinas/ANQ
tamsus/ANQ
ta kuotas/ANQ
teismingas/ANQ
terminuotas/ANQ
tingus/ANQ
tyras/ADNQ
trandytas/ANQ
trinytas/ANQ
trumpokas/ANQ
tu tym tas/ANQ
tvyrus/ANQ
uolotas/ANQ
u gaidingas/ANQ
vadus/ANQ
vaisus/ANQ
valkati kas/ANQ
vargus/ANQ
vasarinas/ANQ
veiksmi kas/ANQ
veltas/ANQ
verslingas/ANQ
ve iki kas/ANQ
vienaspalvi kas/ANQ
viesulingas/ANQ
vingrus/ANQ
vislus/ANQ
vmesuli kas/ANQ
